California statutes. Family Code
(b) If the obligor has made a selection of health coverage prior to the issuance of the court order, the selection shall not be superseded unless the child to be enrolled in the plan will not be provided benefits or coverage where the child resides or the court order specifically directs other health coverage.

(c) If the obligor has not enrolled in an available health plan, there is a choice of coverage, and the court has not ordered coverage by a specific plan, the employer or other person providing health insurance shall enroll the child in the plan that will provide reasonable benefits or coverage where the child resides. If that coverage is not available, the employer or other person providing health insurance shall, within 20 days, return the assignment order to the attorney or person initiating the assignment.

(d) If an assignment order is served on an employer or other person providing health insurance and no coverage is available for the supported child, the employer or other person shall, within 20 days, return the assignment to the attorney or person initiating the assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 927, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3767.

The employer or other person providing health insurance shall do all of the following:

(a) Notify the applicant for the assignment order or notice of assignment of the commencement date of the coverage of the child.

(b) Provide evidence of coverage and any information necessary for the child to obtain benefits through the coverage to both parents or the person having custody of the child and to the local child support agency when requested by the local child support agency.

(c) Upon request by the parents or person having custody of the child, provide all forms and other documentation necessary for the purpose of submitting claims to the insurance carrier which the employer or other person providing health insurance usually provides to insureds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 3.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3768.

(a) An employer or other person providing health insurance who willfully fails to comply with a valid health insurance coverage assignment order entered and served on the employer or other person pursuant to this article is liable to the applicant for the amount incurred in health care services that would otherwise have been covered under the insurance policy but for the conduct of the employer or other person that was contrary to the assignment order.

(b) Willful failure of an employer or other person providing health insurance to comply with a health insurance coverage assignment order is punishable as contempt of court under Section 1218 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3769.

No employer shall use a health insurance coverage assignment order as grounds for refusing to hire a person or for discharging or taking disciplinary action against an employee. An employer who violates this section may be assessed a civil penalty of a maximum of five hundred dollars ($500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3770.

Upon notice of motion by the obligor, the court shall terminate a health insurance coverage assignment order if any of the following conditions exist:

(a) A new order has been issued under Article 1 (commencing with Section 3750) that is inconsistent with the existing assignment.

(b) The employer or other person providing health insurance has discontinued that coverage to the obligor.

(c) The court determines that there is good cause, consistent with Section 3762, to terminate the assignment.

(d) The death or emancipation of the child for whom the health insurance has been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3771.

Upon request of the local child support agency the employer shall provide the following information to the local child support agency within 30 days:

(a) The social security number of the absent parent.

(b) The home address of the absent parent.

(c) Whether the absent parent has a health insurance policy and, if so, the policy names and numbers, and the names of the persons covered.

(d) Whether the health insurance policy provides coverage for dependent children of the absent parent who do not reside in the absent parent’s home.

(e) If there is a subsequent lapse in health insurance coverage, the employer shall notify the local child support agency, giving the date the coverage ended, the reason for the lapse in coverage and, if the lapse is temporary, the date upon which coverage is expected to resume.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 32.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

3772.

The Judicial Council shall adopt forms for the health insurance coverage assignment required or authorized by this article, including, but not limited to, the application, the order, the statement of the obligor’s rights, and an employer’s return form which shall include information on the limitations on the total amount that may be withheld from earnings for obligations, including health insurance assignments, under subdivision (a) of Section 706.052 of the Code of Civil Procedure and Section 1673 of Title 15 of the United States Code, and the information required by Section 3771. The parties and child shall be sufficiently identified on the forms by the inclusion of birth dates, social security numbers, and any other information the Judicial Council determines is necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

3773.

(a) This section applies only to Title IV-D cases where support enforcement services are being provided by the local child support agency pursuant to Section 17400.

(b) After the court has ordered that a parent provide health insurance coverage, the local child support agency shall serve on the employer a national medical support notice in lieu of the health insurance coverage assignment order. The national medical support notice may be combined with the order/notice to withhold income for child support that is authorized by Section 5246.

(c) A national medical support notice shall have the same force and effect as a health insurance coverage assignment order.

(d) The obligor shall have the same right to move to quash or terminate a national medical support notice as provided in this article for a health insurance coverage assignment order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 119, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Deferred Sale of Home Order [3800. - 3810.]

3800.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Custodial parent” means a party awarded physical custody of a child.

(b) “Deferred sale of home order” means an order that temporarily delays the sale and awards the temporary exclusive use and possession of the family home to a custodial parent of a minor child or child for whom support is authorized under Sections 3900 and 3901 or under Section 3910, whether or not the custodial parent has sole or joint custody, in order to minimize the adverse impact of dissolution of marriage or legal separation of the parties on the welfare of the child.

(c) “Resident parent” means a party who has requested or who has already been awarded a deferred sale of home order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3801.

(a) If one of the parties has requested a deferred sale of home order pursuant to this chapter, the court shall first determine whether it is economically feasible to maintain the payments of any note secured by a deed of trust, property taxes, insurance for the home during the period the sale of the home is deferred, and the condition of the home comparable to that at the time of trial.

(b) In making this determination, the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The resident parent’s income.

(2) The availability of spousal support, child support, or both spousal and child support.

(3) Any other sources of funds available to make those payments.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, by requiring the determination under this section, to do all of the following:

(1) Avoid the likelihood
 of possible defaults on the payments of notes and resulting foreclosures.

(2) Avoid inadequate insurance coverage.

(3) Prevent deterioration of the condition of the family home.

(4) Prevent any other circumstance which would jeopardize both parents’ equity in the home.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3802.

(a) If the court determines pursuant to Section 3801 that it is economically feasible to consider ordering a deferred sale of the family home, the court may grant a deferred sale of home order to a custodial parent if the court determines that the order is necessary in order to minimize the adverse impact of dissolution of marriage or legal separation of the parties on the child.

(b) In exercising its discretion to grant or deny a deferred sale of home order, the court shall consider all of the following:

(1) The length of time the child has resided in the home.

(2) The child’s placement or grade in school.

(3) The accessibility and convenience of the home to the child’s school and other services or facilities used by and available to the child, including child care.

(4) Whether the home has been adapted or modified to
 accommodate any physical disabilities of a child or a resident parent in a manner that a change in residence may adversely affect the ability of the resident parent to meet the needs of the child.

(5) The emotional detriment to the child associated with a change in residence.

(6) The extent to which the location of the home permits the resident parent to continue employment.

(7) The financial ability of each parent to obtain suitable housing.

(8) The tax consequences to the parents.

(9) The economic detriment to the nonresident parent in the event of a deferred sale of home order.

(10) Any other factors the court deems just and equitable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3803.

A deferred sale of home order shall state the duration of the order and may include the legal description and assessor’s parcel number of the real property which is subject to the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3804.

A deferred sale of home order may be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the real property is located.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3806.

The court may make an order specifying the parties’ respective responsibilities for the payment of the costs of routine maintenance and capital improvements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3807.

Except as otherwise agreed to by the parties in writing, a deferred sale of home order may be modified or terminated at any time at the discretion of the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3808.

Except as otherwise agreed to by the parties in writing, if the party awarded the deferred sale of home order remarries, or if there is otherwise a change in circumstances affecting the determinations made pursuant to Section 3801 or 3802 or affecting the economic status of the parties or the children on which the award is based, a rebuttable presumption, affecting the burden of proof, is created that further deferral of the sale is no longer an equitable method of minimizing the adverse impact of the dissolution of marriage or legal separation of the parties on the children.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3809.

In making an order pursuant to this chapter, the court shall reserve jurisdiction to determine any issues that arise with respect to the deferred sale of home order including, but not limited to, the maintenance of the home and the tax consequences to each party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3810.

This chapter is applicable regardless of whether the deferred sale of home order is made before or after January 1, 1989.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Software Used to Determine Support [3830. - 3830.]

3830.

(a) On and after January 1, 1994, no court shall use any computer software to assist in determining the appropriate amount of child support or spousal support obligations, unless the software conforms to rules of court adopted by the Judicial Council prescribing standards for the software, which shall ensure that it performs in a manner consistent with the applicable statutes and rules of court for determination of child support or spousal support.

(b) The Judicial Council may contract with an outside agency or organization to analyze software to ensure that it conforms to the standards established by the Judicial Council. The cost of this analysis shall be paid by the applicant software producers and fees therefor shall be established by the Judicial Council in an amount that in the aggregate will defray its costs of administering this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. CHILD SUPPORT [3900. - 4253.]



  CHAPTER 1. Duty of Parent to Support Child [3900. - 3952.]



  ARTICLE 1. Support of Minor Child [3900. - 3902.]

3900.

Subject to this division, the father and mother of a minor child have an equal responsibility to support their child in the manner suitable to the child’s circumstances.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3901.

(a) (1) The duty of support imposed by Section 3900 continues as to an unmarried child who has attained 18 years of age, is a full-time high school student, unless excused pursuant to paragraph (2), and who is not self-supporting, until the time the child completes the 12th grade or attains 19 years of age, whichever occurs first.

(2) A child is excused from the requirement to be a full-time high school student for purposes of paragraph (1) if the child has a medical condition documented by a physician that prevents full-time school attendance.

(b) This section does not limit a parent’s ability to agree to provide additional support or the
 court’s power to inquire whether an agreement to provide additional support has been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.   (AB 3248)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3902.

The court may direct that an allowance be made to the parent of a child for whom support may be ordered out of the child’s property for the child’s past or future support, on conditions that are proper, if the direction is for the child’s benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 131.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Support of Adult Child [3910. - 3910.]

3910.

(a) Each parent of a child has an equal responsibility to maintain, to the extent of their ability, their child of whatever age who is incapacitated from earning a living and without sufficient means.

(b) The court may order that a support payment be paid to a special needs trust.
 For purposes of this section, “special needs trust” means a trust that meets the requirements described in subparagraph (A) or (C) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of Section 1396p of Title 42 of the United States Code and paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 50489.9 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) This section does not limit the duty of support under Sections 3900
 and 3901.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 25, Sec. 1.   (AB 2397)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Support of Grandchild [3930. - 3930.]

3930.

A parent does not have the duty to support a child of the parent’s child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Liability to Others Who Provide Support for Child [3950. - 3952.]

3950.

If a parent neglects to provide articles necessary for the parent’s child who is under the charge of the parent, according to the circumstances of the parent, a third person may in good faith supply the necessaries and recover their reasonable value from the parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3951.

(a) A parent is not bound to compensate the other parent, or a relative, for the voluntary support of the parent’s child, without an agreement for compensation.

(b) A parent is not bound to compensate a stranger for the support of a child who has abandoned the parent without just cause.

(c) Nothing in this section relieves a parent of the obligation to support a child during any period in which the state, county, or other governmental entity provides support for the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

3952.

If a parent chargeable with the support of a child dies leaving the child chargeable to the county or leaving the child confined in a state institution to be cared for in whole or in part at the expense of the state, and the parent leaves an estate sufficient for the child’s support, the supervisors of the county or the director of the state department having jurisdiction over the institution may claim provision for the child’s support from the parent’s estate, and for this purpose has the same remedies as a creditor against the estate of the parent and may obtain reimbursement from the successor of the deceased parent to the extent provided in Division 8 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Probate Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Court-Ordered Child Support [4000. - 4253.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4000. - 4014.]

4000.

If a parent has the duty to provide for the support of the parent’s child and willfully fails to so provide, the other parent, or the child by a guardian ad litem, may bring an action against the parent to enforce the duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4001.

In any proceeding where there is at issue the support of a minor child or a child for whom support is authorized under Section 3901 or 3910, the court may order either or both parents to pay an amount necessary for the support of the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

(a) The county may proceed on behalf of a child to enforce the child’s right of support against a parent.

(b) If the county furnishes support to a child, the county has the same right as the child to secure reimbursement and obtain continuing support. The right of the county to reimbursement is subject to any limitation otherwise imposed by the law of this state.

(c) The court may order the parent to pay the county reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs in a proceeding brought by the county pursuant to this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

In any case in which the support of a child is at issue, the court may, upon a showing of good cause, order a separate trial on that issue. The separate trial shall be given preference over other civil cases, except matters to which special precedence may be given by law, for assigning a trial date. If the court has also ordered a separate trial on the issue of custody pursuant to Section 3023, the two issues shall be tried together.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 133.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

In a proceeding where there is at issue the support of a child, the court shall require the parties to reveal whether a party is currently receiving, or intends to apply for, public assistance under the Family Economic Security Act of 1982 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) for the maintenance of the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

At the request of either party, the court shall make appropriate findings with respect to the circumstances on which the order for support of a child is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4006.

In a proceeding for child support under this code, including, but not limited to, Division 17 (commencing with Section 17000), the court shall consider the health insurance coverage, if any, of the parties to the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 33.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.

(a) If a court orders a person to make specified payments for support of a child during the child’s minority, or until the child is married or otherwise emancipated, or until the death of, or the occurrence of a specified event as to, a child for whom support is authorized under Section 3901 or 3910, the obligation of the person ordered to pay support terminates on the happening of the contingency. The court may, in the original order for support, order the custodial parent or other person to whom payments are to be made to notify the person ordered to make the payments, or the person’s attorney of record, of the happening of the contingency.

(b) If the custodial parent or other person having physical custody of the child, to whom payments are to be made, fails to notify the person ordered to make the payments, or the attorney of record of the person ordered to make the payments, of the happening of the contingency and continues to
 accept support payments, the person shall refund all moneys received that accrued after the happening of the contingency, except that the overpayments shall first be applied to any support payments that are then in default.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4007.5.

(a) Every money judgment or order for support of a child shall be suspended, by operation of law, for any period exceeding 90 consecutive days in which the person ordered to pay support is incarcerated or involuntarily institutionalized, unless the person owing support has the means to pay support while incarcerated or involuntarily institutionalized.

(b) (1) The child support obligation shall be suspended effective on the first day of the first full month of incarceration or involuntary institutionalization.

(2) For
 persons owing support who are released from incarceration or involuntary institutionalization on or after January 1, 2024, the child support obligation shall resume on the first day of the 10th month after release from incarceration or involuntary institutionalization of the person owing support.

(3) If the person owing support obtains employment prior to the date set for reinstatement, the person to whom the support is owed or the local child support agency may seek a court order reinstating child support obligations at the amount determined by the court pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 4050).

(4) This section does not
 preclude a person owing support or the local child support agency from seeking a modification of the child support order pursuant to Section 3651, based on a change in circumstances or any other appropriate reason.

(c) (1) A local child support agency enforcing a child support order under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.) may, upon written notice of the proposed adjustment to the support obligor and obligee along with a blank form provided for the support obligor or obligee to object to the administrative adjustment to the local child support agency, administratively adjust account balances for a money judgment or order for support of a child suspended pursuant to subdivision (a) if all of the following
 occurs:

(A) The agency verifies that arrears and interest were accrued in violation of this section.

(B) The agency verifies that, to the extent known to the agency, the person owing support does not have the means to pay support while incarcerated or involuntarily institutionalized.

(C) Neither the support obligor nor obligee objects, within 30 days of receipt of the notice of proposed adjustment, whether in writing or by telephone, to the administrative adjustment by the local child support agency.

(2) If either the support obligor or obligee objects to the administrative adjustment set forth in this subdivision, the agency shall not adjust the order, but
 shall file a motion with the court to seek to adjust the arrears and shall serve copies of the motion on the parties, who may file an objection to the agency’s motion with the court.  The obligor’s arrears shall not be adjusted unless the court approves the adjustment.

(3) The agency may perform this adjustment without regard to whether it was enforcing the child support order at the time the parent owing support qualified for relief under this section.

(d) This section does not prohibit the local child support agency or a party from petitioning a court for a determination of child support or arrears amounts.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Incarcerated or involuntarily institutionalized” includes, but is not limited to, involuntary confinement to a federal or state prison, a county jail, a juvenile facility operated by the Division of Juvenile Facilities in the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, or a mental health facility.

(2) “Suspend” means that the payment due on the current child support order, an arrears payment on a preexisting arrears balance, or interest on arrears created during a qualifying period of incarceration pursuant to this section is, by operation of law, set to zero dollars ($0) for the period in which the person owing support is incarcerated or involuntarily institutionalized.

(f) This section applies to any child support
 obligation that accrues on or after the enactment of this section regardless of when the child support order was established.

(g) The Department of Child Support Services shall, by July 1, 2023, and in consultation with the Judicial Council, develop forms to implement this section.

(h) On or before January 1, 2026, the Department of Child Support Services, in consultation with the Judicial Council, shall conduct an evaluation of the effectiveness of the administrative adjustment process authorized by this section and shall report the results of the review, as well as any recommended changes, to the Assembly Judiciary Committee and the Senate Judiciary Committee.  The evaluation shall include a review of the ease of the process to both the obligor and obligee, as well as an
 analysis of the number of cases administratively adjusted, the number of cases adjusted in court, and the number of cases not adjusted.

(i) It is the intent of the Legislature to ensure qualified persons are provided the support suspension by operation of law for qualified periods of incarceration or involuntary institutionalization that existed during the operative terms of the earlier versions of this statute regardless of whether the judicial or administrative determination of arrears is made before or after the repeal of the statute, if the earlier version of the statute provided for the money
 judgment or order for support to be suspended by operation of law. This subdivision is declarative of existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 565, Sec. 1.   (AB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4008.

The community property, the quasi-community property, and the separate property may be subjected to the support of the children in the proportions the court determines are just.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4009.

An original order for child support may be made retroactive to the date of filing the petition, complaint, or other initial pleading. If the parent ordered to pay support was not served with the petition, complaint, or other initial pleading within 90 days after filing and the court finds that the parent was not intentionally evading service, the child support order shall be effective no earlier than the date of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 305, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4010.

In a proceeding in which the court orders a payment for the support of a child, the court shall, at the time of providing written notice of the order, provide the parties with a document describing the procedures by which the order may be modified.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 136.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4011.

Payment of child support ordered by the court shall be made by the person owing the support payment before payment of any debts owed to creditors.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4012.

Upon a showing of good cause, the court may order a parent required to make a payment of child support to give reasonable security for the payment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4013.

If obligations for support of a child are discharged in bankruptcy, the court may make all proper orders for the support of the child that the court determines are just.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4014.

(a) An order for child support issued or modified pursuant to this chapter shall include a provision requiring the obligor and child support obligee to notify the other parent or, if the order requires payment through an agency designated under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.), the agency named in the order, of the name and address of the person’s current employer.

(b) The requirements set forth in this subdivision apply only in cases when the local child support agency is not providing child support services pursuant to Section 17400. To the extent required by federal law, and subject to applicable confidentiality provisions of state or federal law,
 a judgment for paternity and an order for child support entered or modified pursuant to any law shall include a provision requiring the child support obligor and obligee to file with the court all of the following information:

(1) Residential and mailing address.

(2) Social security number, individual taxpayer identification number, or other uniform identification number.

(3) Telephone number.

(4) Driver’s license number or identification card number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(5) Name, address, and telephone number of the employer.

(6) Any other information prescribed by the Judicial Council.

The judgment or order shall specify that each parent is responsible for providing the parent’s own information, that the information must be filed with the court within 10 days of the court order, and that new or different information must be filed with the court within 10 days after any event causing a change in the previously provided information.

(c) The requirements set forth in this subdivision shall only apply in cases in which the local child support agency is not providing child support services pursuant to Section 17400. Once the child support registry, as described in Section 17391 is operational, a judgment for parentage and an order for child support entered or modified pursuant to any law shall include a provision
 requiring the child support obligor and obligee to file and keep updated the information specified in subdivision (b) with the child support registry.

(d) The Judicial Council shall develop forms to implement this section. The forms shall be developed so as not to delay the implementation of the Statewide Child Support Registry described in Section 17391 and shall be available no later than 30 days prior to the implementation of the Statewide Child Support Registry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 43.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statewide Uniform Guideline [4050. - 4077.]

4050.

In adopting the statewide uniform guideline provided in this article, it is the intention of the Legislature to ensure that this state remains in compliance with federal regulations for child support guidelines.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

The court shall adhere to the statewide uniform guideline and may depart from the guideline only in the special circumstances set forth in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 138.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.5.

(a) The statewide uniform guideline, as required by federal regulations, shall apply in any case in which a child has more than two parents. The court shall apply the guideline by dividing child support obligations among the parents based on income and amount of time spent with the child by each parent, pursuant to Section 4053.

(b) Consistent with federal regulations, after calculating the amount of support owed by each parent under the guideline, the presumption that the guideline amount of support is correct may be rebutted if the court finds that the application of the guideline in that case would be unjust or inappropriate due to special circumstances, pursuant to Section 4057. If the court makes that finding, the
 court shall divide child support obligations among the parents in a manner that is just and appropriate based on income and amount of time spent with the child by each parent, applying the principles set forth in Section 4053 and this article.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require reprogramming of the California Child Support Enforcement System, a change to the statewide uniform guideline for determining child support set forth in Section 4055, or a revision by the Department of Child Support Services of its regulations, policies, procedures, forms, or training materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 474, Sec. 9.   (AB 2882)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4053.

In implementing the statewide uniform guideline, the courts shall adhere to the following principles:

(a) A parent’s first and principal obligation is to support the parent’s minor children according to the parent’s circumstances and station in life.

(b) Both parents are mutually responsible for the support of their children.

(c) The guideline takes into account each parent’s actual income and level of responsibility for the children.

(d) Each parent should pay for the support of the children according
 to the parent’s ability.

(e) The guideline seeks to place the interests of children as the state’s top priority.

(f) Children should share in the standard of living of both parents. Child support may therefore appropriately improve the standard of living of the custodial household to improve the lives of the children.

(g) Child support orders in cases in which both parents have high levels of responsibility for the children should reflect the increased costs of raising the children in two homes and should minimize significant disparities in the children’s living standards in the two homes.

(h) The financial needs of the children should be met through private
 financial resources as much as possible.

(i) It is presumed that a parent having primary physical responsibility for the children contributes a significant portion of available resources for the support of the children.

(j) The guideline seeks to encourage fair and efficient settlements of conflicts between parents and seeks to minimize the need for litigation.

(k) The guideline is intended to be presumptively correct in all cases, and only under special circumstances should child support orders fall below the child support mandated by the guideline formula.

(l) Child support orders shall ensure that children actually receive fair, timely, and sufficient
 support reflecting the state’s high standard of living and high costs of raising children compared to other states.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 44.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4054.

(a) The Judicial Council shall periodically review the statewide uniform guideline to recommend to the Legislature appropriate revisions.

(b) The review shall include all of the following:

(1) Economic data on the cost of raising children.

(2) Labor market data, such as unemployment rates, employment rates, hours worked, and earnings, by occupation and skill level for the state and local job markets.

(3) The impact of guideline policies and amounts on custodial and noncustodial parents who have family incomes below 200 percent of the federal poverty level.

(4) Factors that influence employment rates among custodial and noncustodial parents and compliance with child support orders.

 (5) An analysis of case data, gathered through sampling or other methods, on the actual application
 of, and deviations from, the guideline after the guideline’s operative date, as well as the rates of orders entered by default, orders entered based on presumed income and earning capacity, and orders determined using the low-income adjustment.

(6) An
 analysis of guidelines and studies from other states, and other research and studies available to or undertaken by the Judicial Council.

(7) A comparison of payments on child support orders by case characteristics, including whether the order was entered by default, based on earning capacity or presumed income, or determined using the low-income adjustment.
